Hawaii statutes.
§574-1 Married persons; civil union
partners. Upon marriage or civil union, each of the parties to a marriage
or partners in a civil union shall declare the middle and last names each will
use as a married person or civil union partner. The last name or names chosen
may be any middle or last name legally used at any time, past or present, by
either spouse or partner, or any combination of such names, which may, but need
not, be separated by a hyphen. The middle name or names chosen may be any
middle or last name legally used at any time, past or present, by either spouse
or partner, or any combination of such names, which may, but need not, be
separated by a hyphen. [L 1860, p 32, §1; RL 1925, §3119; RL 1935, §4663; RL
1945, §12384; RL 1955, §327-1; HRS §574-1; am L 1975, c 114, §1; am L 1991, c
121, §1; am L 1993, c 346, §1; am L 2012, c 267, §13]

Note

The 2012 amendment is retroactive to January 1, 2012. L
2012, c 267, §20.

Case Notes

Mentioned: 57 H. 82, 549 P.2d 739.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next